Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1206
Construction of water wells, defined.

Construction of water wells shall mean and include all acts necessary to make a water well usable for the purpose for which it is intended including, without limitation, the siting of and excavation for the water well and its construction, alteration, or repair, but excluding the installation of pumps and pumping equipment.

Laws 1986, LB 310, § 6.